Washington statutes.
RCW 41.16.070

Contributions by firefighters.

(1) Every firefighter employed on and after January 1, 1947, shall contribute to the fund and there shall be deducted from his or her pay and placed in the fund an amount in accordance with the following table:

Firefighter whose

age at last birthday

Contributions and

at time of entry

deductions from

of service was:

salary

21

and under. . . .

5.00%

22

. . . .

5.24%

23

. . . .

5.50%

24

. . . .

5.77%

25

. . . .

6.07%

26

. . . .

6.38%

27

. . . .

6.72%

28

. . . .

7.09%

29

. . . .

7.49%

30

and over. . . .

7.92%

(2) Every firefighter employed prior to January 1, 1947, and continuing active employment shall contribute to the fund and there shall be deducted from his or her salary and placed in the fund, five percent of his or her salary.

(3) Every firefighter actively employed and eligible for retirement and not retired shall contribute to the fund and there shall be deducted from his or her salary and placed in the fund, four percent of his or her salary.

[ 2007 c 218 s 23; 1947 c 91 s 7; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9578-46. Prior: 1929 c 86 s 14; 1919 c 196 s 18.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.